Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.163

Service voter.

"Service voter" means any elector of the state of Washington who is a member of the armed forces under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1973 ff-6 while in active service, is a member of a reserve component of the armed forces, is a student or member of the faculty at a United States military academy, is a member of the merchant marine of the United States, or is a member of a religious group or welfare agency officially attached to and serving with the armed forces of the United States.

[ 2009 c 369 s 3; 2003 c 111 s 127. Prior: 1991 c 23 s 13; 1987 c 346 s 8. Formerly RCW 29.01.155.]

NOTES:

Legislative intent—Effective date—1987 c 346: See notes following RCW 29A.40.010.